Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.270

Natural resource-related and environmentally based grant and loan programs—Administration and monitoring assistance.

(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and performance assessment.

(2) The office of financial management and the recreation and conservation office shall assist natural resource-related agencies in developing recommendations for a monitoring program to measure outcome-focused performance measures required by this section. The recommendations must be consistent with the framework and coordinated monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight committee established in *RCW 77.85.210.

(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office of financial management on the implementation of this section.

(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation commission, the recreation and conservation funding board, the salmon recovery funding board, and the public works board within the department of commerce.

(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants, public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW 70A.305.190; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter 70A.135 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW 79.105.150; habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation program under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW; and the public works trust fund program under chapter 43.155 RCW. The term also includes programs administered by the department of fish and wildlife related to protection or recovery of fish stocks which are funded with moneys from the capital budget.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1050; 2009 c 345 s 12. Prior: 2007 c 444 s 7; 2007 c 241 s 5; 2001 c 227 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 77.85.210 was repealed by 2005 c 309 s 10.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 345: See notes following RCW 77.85.030.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 241: See notes following RCW 79A.25.005.

Findings—Intent—2001 c 227: "The legislature finds that the amount of overall requests for funding for natural resource-related programs in the capital budget has been steadily growing. The legislature also finds that there is an increasing interest by the public in examining the performance of the projects and programs to determine the return on their investments and that a coordinated and integrated response by state agencies will allow for better targeting of resources. The legislature further finds that there is a need to improve the data and the integration of data that is collected by state agencies and grant and loan recipients in order to better measure the outcomes of projects and programs. The legislature intends to begin implementing the recommendations contained in the joint legislative audit and review committee's report number 01-1 on investing in the environment in order to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability of these natural resource-related programs funded in the state capital budget." [ 2001 c 227 s 1.]